Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 2
CONDITIONS FOR PROVIDING SERVICES

29-27-201. Vote - referendum.

Before a local government may engage or offer to engage in providing cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service, an election shall be called on whether or not the local government shall provide the proposed cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service.

The ballot at an election conducted pursuant to this section shall pose the question as a single subject and shall include a description of the nature of the proposed service, the role that the local government will have in provision of the service, and the intended subscribers of such service. The ballot proposition shall not take effect until submitted to the electors and approved by the majority of those voting on the ballot.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1282, § 1, effective June 3.

29-27-202. Exemption for unserved areas.

A local government shall be exempt from the requirements of this part 2 and may engage or offer to engage in providing cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service if:

No private provider of cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service provides the service anywhere within the boundaries of the local government;

The governing body of the local government has submitted a written request to provide the service to any incumbent provider of cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service within the boundaries of the local government; and

The incumbent provider has not agreed within sixty days of the receipt of a request submitted pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) to provide the service or, if the provider has agreed, it has not commenced providing the service within fourteen months of the receipt of the request.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1282, § 1, effective June 3.